District of Columbia statutes.
34-1254.04

Negotiation of an initial franchise agreement.

(a)

If the Office determines under § 34-1254.03 that an applicant has the ability and commitment to adequately provide cable service in the District and to meet the cable-related needs and interests of the District and of District residents, the Office shall commence the negotiation of the terms of a franchise agreement between the District and the applicant.

(b)

The Office and the applicant shall agree on the terms of a proposed franchise agreement within one year after the commencement of the negotiations under subsection (a) of this section. The Office may extend the one-year period of negotiations for up to 180 additional days, if additional time is necessary to finalize the terms of the proposed franchise agreement and there is good cause for not having finalized the agreement within the one-year period.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 404
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
This section is referenced in § 34-1254.06.